Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 23 Wyoming Residential Mortgage Practices Act
§ 40-23-113.
Disclosure of mortgage lender fees.

Within three (3) working days of taking a mortgage loan application and prior to receiving any consideration, other than third party fees, from the borrower, the mortgage lender shall:

Disclose the terms of the loan to the borrower in compliance with the disclosure requirements of the federal Truth-in-Lending Act, its associated regulations, and the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act and its associated regulations and any other applicable federal and state requirements;

If a prepayment penalty may be a condition of the residential mortgage loan offered to a borrower, that fact shall be separately disclosed in writing to the borrower and the borrower shall agree in writing to accept that condition. The disclosure shall state that a prepayment penalty provision imposes a charge if the borrower refinances or pays off the mortgage loan before the date for repayment stated in the loan agreement. The written disclosure shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall initially be delivered along with the good faith estimate of settlement costs within three (3) business days after accepting an application from the borrower. The disclosure shall subsequently be provided by the lender and signed by the borrower at the same time the borrower is given the final federal Truth-in-Lending Act disclosure.

With the exception of a loan cancellation fee, a licensed mortgage lender shall not require a borrower to pay any fees or charges prior to a residential mortgage loan closing, except:

Charges actually incurred by the licensee on behalf of the borrower for services which have been rendered by third parties necessary to process the application. These fees may include, but are not limited to, fees for credit reports, flood insurance certifications, property inspections, title insurance commitments, uniform commercial code article 4 lien searches, and appraisals;

A rate lock in fee; and

A commitment fee upon approval of the residential mortgage loan.

A loan cancellation fee may be charged and collected by a licensee at any time either prior to the scheduled closing of a residential mortgage loan transaction or subsequent thereto.

Any fees charged under the authority of this section shall be reasonable and customary as to the type and the amount of the fee charged.

A mortgage lender shall not receive any fee that inures to the benefit of the mortgage lender, either directly or indirectly, if the fee exceeds the fee disclosed on the most recent good faith estimate unless:

The need to charge the higher fee was not reasonably foreseeable at the time the good faith estimate was written; and

The mortgage lender has provided to the borrower, no less than three (3) business days prior to the signing of the mortgage loan closing documents, a new good faith estimate of settlement costs, a clear written explanation of the increase in the fee and the reason for charging a fee that exceeds the fee which was previously disclosed.

If the fee was originally disclosed as a percentage of the mortgage loan amount and the dollar amount of the fee increases because the mortgage loan amount increases, but the fee as a percentage of the mortgage loan amount does not change, then no redisclosure shall be required unless the fee increased by more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “and any other applicable federal and state requirements” at the end of (a)(i); substituted the present third and fourth sentences of (a)(ii) for the former last sentence which read: “The written disclosure shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall be delivered at the same time the borrower is given the federal Truth-in-Lending Act disclosure.” in (a)(ii); added (e) and (f); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii), in the first sentence, deleted “prepayment penalty provision imposes a charge if the” preceding “that condition”, and in the second sentence, inserted “prepayment penalty provision imposes a charge if the” preceding “borrower refinances.”

§ 40-23-114.
Disclosure of mortgage broker fees.

Within three (3) business days of a borrower signing a completed mortgage loan application and before the borrower provides any consideration to the licensee, the licensee shall execute and deliver to the borrower a mortgage brokerage agreement. The mortgage brokerage agreement shall be in writing, signed and dated by both the borrower and the authorized representative of the licensed mortgage broker whose services to the borrower constitute mortgage brokering and shall contain the following information:

That the mortgage broker cannot make mortgage loans or issue loan commitments in the mortgage broker’s name;

That the mortgage broker cannot guarantee acceptance into any particular mortgage loan program or promise any specific mortgage loan terms or conditions;

A good faith estimate of the fees to be collected, including a credit report fee, property appraisal fee or any other third party fee;

The terms and conditions for obtaining a refund of any fees or arranging for the transfer of third party service work products to another mortgage lender or mortgage broker, if any. The amount of any fees collected in excess of the actual cost shall be returned within sixty (60) days after rejection, withdrawal of an application or closing of the loan.

The mortgage brokerage agreement shall be the only agreement between the borrower and licensee with respect to a single mortgage loan transaction, except that the licensed mortgage broker shall also provide to the borrower disclosure statements necessary to comply with the federal Truth-in-Lending Act and its associated regulations, the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act and its associated regulations, and any other applicable federal and state requirements.

A licensed mortgage broker shall not require a borrower to pay any fees or charges prior to the mortgage loan closing, except charges actually incurred by the licensed mortgage broker on behalf of the borrower for services from third parties necessary to process the mortgage loan application, such as credit reports and appraisals.

A mortgage broker shall not receive any fee that inures to the benefit of the mortgage broker, either directly or indirectly if it exceeds the fee disclosed on the most recent good faith estimate unless:

The need to charge the higher fee was not reasonably foreseeable at the time the good faith estimate was written; and

The mortgage broker has provided to the borrower, no less than three (3) business days prior to the signing of the mortgage loan closing documents, a new good faith estimate of settlement costs, a clear written explanation of the increase in the fee and the reason for charging a fee that exceeds that which was previously disclosed.

If the fee was originally disclosed as a percentage of the mortgage loan amount, and the dollar amount of the fee increases because the mortgage loan amount increases, but the fee as a percentage of the mortgage loan amount does not change, then no redisclosure shall be required unless the fee increased by more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

Any fees charged under the authority of this section shall be reasonable and customary as to the type and the amount of the fee charged.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “and shall contain the following information:” in the introductory language of (a); inserted (a)(i) through (a)(iv); in the introductory language of (d), substituted “receive any fee” for “charge any fee,” and inserted “, either directly or indirectly”; inserted “a new good faith estimate of settlement costs,” in (d)(ii); and added (f).

Increased fees.

Because a
mortgage company received mortgage broker fees in excess of the fees
originally disclosed to the borrowers in the transactions at issue,
and because it did not provide a clear written explanation of the
increased fees or the reason for charging fees exceeding those which
were previously disclosed, the State Banking Commissioner properly
concluded that the company was statutorily precluded from accepting
the increased fees. CalCon Mut. Mortg. Corp. v. State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Audit, 2014 WY 56, 323 P.3d 1098,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2014).

Construction.

“Most
recent good faith estimate,” as used this section, refers to
the estimate that has previously been provided to the borrower. CalCon Mut. Mortg. Corp. v. State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Audit, 2014 WY 56, 323 P.3d 1098,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 40-23-115.
Loan commitments; prepayment penalty disclosure by mortgage broker.

A mortgage broker may issue a loan commitment and may furnish a lock-in of the interest rate and program on behalf of the mortgage lender when the mortgage broker has obtained a written or electronically transmitted loan commitment or lock-in for the mortgage loan from the mortgage lender on behalf of the borrower. The loan commitment issued by the mortgage broker to the borrower on behalf of the mortgage lender shall be in the same form and substance as issued by the mortgage lender and shall identify the mortgage lender by name.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 76, § 2.

If a prepayment penalty is a condition of the residential mortgage loan offered to a borrower, that fact shall be separately disclosed in writing to the borrower and the borrower shall agree in writing to accept that condition. The disclosure shall state that a prepayment penalty provision imposes a charge if the borrower refinances or pays off the mortgage loan before the date for repayment stated in the loan agreement. The written disclosure shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall be delivered as soon as the condition is known, but no later than the issuance of a commitment, for the mortgage loan product chosen by the borrower.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section and repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(iv) pertaining to certain application and disclosure requirements.

§ 40-23-116.
Trust accounts.

All monies received from a borrower for payment of third party provider services shall be deemed as held in trust immediately upon receipt. All such trust funds shall be deposited, prior to the end of the third business day following receipt of the funds, in a trust account of a federally insured financial institution. All trust account funds collected under this act shall remain on deposit in a noninterest bearing trust account until disbursement. The trust account shall be designated and maintained for the benefit of borrowers. Monies maintained in the trust account shall be exempt from execution, attachment or garnishment. A mortgage lender or mortgage broker shall not in any way encumber the corpus of the trust account or commingle any other operating funds with trust account funds. Withdrawals from the trust account shall be only for the payment of bona fide services rendered by a third party provider or for refunds to a borrower.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-117.
Prohibited practices.

No licensee or person required to have a license shall:

Pay compensation to, contract with or employ in any manner, any person engaged in mortgage lending or brokering activities who is not properly licensed unless such person is exempt under W.S.

40-23-105

;

Obtain any exclusive dealing or exclusive agency agreement from any borrower;

Delay closing of any residential mortgage loan for the purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees or charges payable by the borrower;

Accept any fees at closing which were not previously disclosed fully to the borrower;

Obtain any agreement or instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution;

Engage in any misrepresentation in connection with a residential mortgage loan;

Directly or indirectly make any statement regarding value, except that a copy of the sales contract for purchase transactions may be provided, or make or provide payment of any kind to any in-house or fee appraiser for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of any real estate which is to be covered by a residential mortgage loan;

Make any false promises likely to influence or persuade, or pursue a course of misrepresentations and false promises through agents, solicitors, advertising or otherwise;

Misrepresent, circumvent or conceal any of the material particulars or the nature thereof, regarding a transaction to which it is a party;

Enter into any agreement, with or without the payment of a fee, to fix in advance a particular interest rate or other term in a residential mortgage loan unless written confirmation of the agreement is delivered to the borrower.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Directly or indirectly make any statement regarding value, except that a copy of the sales contract for purchase transactions may be provided, or make or provide payment” for “Make payment, whether directly or indirectly,” at the beginning of (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-23-118.
License suspension or revocation.

The commissioner may suspend, not to exceed six (6) months, or revoke a license if the commissioner finds:

Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when the licensee applied for its license, would have been grounds for denying the application;

The licensee violated any provision of this act or any rule or order validly promulgated by the commissioner;

The licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner;

The licensee refuses to permit the commissioner to make any examination authorized by this act;

The licensee willfully fails to make any report required by this act;

The competence, experience, character or general fitness of the licensee indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the licensee to continue to conduct business;

The bond of the licensee has been revoked, cancelled, expired or otherwise is not effective;

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager or employee of the licensee has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving any aspect of the mortgage lending business, breach of trust, or fraudulent or dishonest dealing;

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager or employee of the licensee has had a license substantially equivalent to a license under this act, and issued by another state, denied, revoked or suspended under the laws of that state;

The licensee has filed an application for a license which as of the date the license was issued, or as of the date of an order denying, suspending or revoking a license, was incomplete in any material respect or contained any statement that was, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, if the commissioner finds that probable cause for revocation of a license exists and that enforcement of this act and the public interest require immediate suspension of the license pending investigation, he may, after a hearing upon five (5) days written notice, enter an order suspending the license for not more than thirty (30) days.

The commissioner may, in his discretion, reinstate a license, terminate a suspension or grant a new license to a person whose license has been revoked or suspended if no fact or condition then exists which clearly would justify the commissioner in refusing to grant a license.

For purposes of this section, “licensee” shall also mean a licensed mortgage loan originator pursuant to W.S.

40-23-124

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “, cancelled, expired or otherwise is not effective” in (a)(vii); and substituted “misdemeanor involving any aspect of the mortgage lending business, breach of trust, or fraudulent or dishonest dealing.” for “a misdemeanor involving any aspect of the financial services business;” in (a)(viii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-119.
Orders to cease and desist.

If the commissioner determines that a violation of this act or of a rule adopted or an order issued under this act by a licensee is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers or the public as a result of the violation or cause insolvency of the licensee, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the licensee to cease and desist from the violation. The order becomes effective upon service upon the licensee.

If the commissioner determines that a person is conducting mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities governed under this act without a valid license, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the unlicensed person to cease and desist from mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities. The order becomes effective upon service upon the unlicensed person.

Before issuing a final cease and desist order under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the commissioner shall serve notice of intent to issue the order upon the person being ordered to cease and desist. The notice shall be in writing and shall direct the person to discontinue the violations of law and cease and desist mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities. The notice shall be served by certified mail return receipt requested to the last known address of the person or shall be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Notice of the order shall include:

A statement of the grounds for issuing the proposed order, including a citation to the statute or rule involved;

A statement of the facts in support of the allegations;

A statement informing the person of the right to a hearing on the order.

In an emergency, the commissioner may petition the district court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order.

An order to cease and desist becomes effective upon service upon the person.

An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

A person served with an order to cease and desist for violating this act may petition the district court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting or suspending the enforcement, operation or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The commissioner shall commence a contested case proceeding within twenty (20) days after issuing an order to cease and desist.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-120.
Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this act. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person’s authorized representative and shall indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act has been violated.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-121.
Civil penalties.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty upon a person who violates this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus the state’s costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney’s fees. Any penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the public school fund of the appropriate county as required by article 7, section 5 of the Wyoming constitution.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-122.
Criminal penalties.

A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this act or who intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in the record is guilty of a felony, punishable by not less than three (3) years imprisonment or a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

An individual who knowingly engages in any activity for which a license is required under this act, without being licensed under this act is guilty of a felony punishable by not less than three (3) years imprisonment or a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

A person, except an individual, who knowingly engages in any activity for which a license is required under this act, without being licensed under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00).

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-123.
Hearings.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 40-23-103(a)(vii), 40-23-108(c) and

40-23-109

, the commissioner shall not suspend or revoke a license, issue an order to cease and desist or assess a civil penalty without notice and an opportunity to be heard.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “40-23-103(a)(vii),”.

§ 40-23-124.
Loan originator licensing; registration; rulemaking.

An individual, unless specifically exempted under subsection (c) of this section, shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator for any dwelling located in Wyoming without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license in accordance with this act. Each licensed mortgage loan originator shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to licensing and minimize disruption in the marketplace, the effective date for subsection (a) of this section shall be July 1, 2010.

An individual is exempt from subsection (a) of this section if he is:

A registered mortgage loan originator, when acting for an entity described in W.S. 40-23-102(a)(xxx)(B)(I), (II) or (III);

An individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual;

An individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that serves as the individual’s residence;

A licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator;

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities, who does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless the independent contractor, loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a license pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Each independent contractor, loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator shall have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing process the commissioner may establish licensing rules or regulations and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(iii), substituted “the individual's” for “a seller's.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-125.
Loan originator application; processing.

Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply in a form prescribed by the commissioner. Each application form shall contain content as set forth by rule of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this act.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the commissioner may establish relationships or contracts with the registry or other entities designated by the registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this act.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience, including the submission of authorization for the registry and the commissioner to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (c)(i) of this section and subparagraph (c)(ii)(B) of this section, the commissioner may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of subparagraphs (c)(ii)(A) and (B) of this section, the commissioner may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner.

Each application submitted under subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by an application fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00), as established by rule of the commissioner. When an application for licensure is denied or withdrawn, the commissioner shall retain all fees paid by the applicant.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-126.
Issuance of loan originator license.

The commissioner shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court:

During the seven (7) year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust or money laundering;

A pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for the purposes of this paragraph.

The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this act;

The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement pursuant to W.S.

40-23-127

;

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement of W.S.

40-23-128

.

For purposes of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, a person has shown that he is not financially responsible when he has shown a disregard in the management of his own financial condition. A determination that an individual has not shown financial responsibility shall include, but not be limited to:

Having any outstanding judgment, except a judgment solely as a result of medical expenses;

Having any outstanding tax lien or other government lien;

Having any foreclosure within the past three (3) years;

Having a pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three (3) years.

Upon written request, an applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The commissioner has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied, or objections to the application have been filed with the commissioner;

The commissioner has not issued a license within sixty (60) days after a complete application for the license was filed.

If a hearing is held, the applicant and those filing objections shall reimburse, pro rata, the commissioner for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the hearing. Notwithstanding any provision under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, a request for hearing shall not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the applicant has received notification by certified mail that the application has been denied and stating in substance the commissioner’s finding supporting denial of the application or that objections have been filed and the substance thereof.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-127.
Prelicensing and relicensing education of loan originators.

In order to meet the prelicensing education requirement referred to in W.S. 40-23-126(a)(iv), a person shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations related to mortgage origination;

Three (3) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the registry. The review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity which is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the registry.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the registry in paragraphs (a)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in Wyoming.

An individual licensed under W.S.

40-23-124

after July 1, 2009 and who subsequently applies to be licensed again:

Shall not have to complete prelicensing education requirements;

Shall have completed all the continuing education requirements pursuant to W.S.

40-23-130

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-128.
Testing of mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the written test requirement under W.S. 40-23-126(a)(v), an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this section, a qualified written test developed by the registry and administered by a test provider approved by the registry.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subsection (a) of this section unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

Wyoming law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and Wyoming law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace and fair lending issues.

Nothing in the section shall prohibit a test provider from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant, the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions.

An individual may retake a test three (3) times with each test taking occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test.

After failing three (3) tests, an individual shall wait at least six (6) months before taking the test again.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for at least five (5) years shall retake the written test. Any time the individual spends working as a registered mortgage loan originator shall not be counted against this five (5) year period.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-129.
Standards for loan originator license renewal; rulemaking.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance under W.S. 40-23-126(a)(i) through (v);

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in W.S.

40-23-130

;

The mortgage loan originator has paid the license renewal fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00), as established by rule of the commissioner.

Each mortgage loan originator license shall expire on December 31. The license shall be renewed annually by satisfying the minimum standards for license renewal under subsection (a) of this section not less than thirty (30) days before the stated expiration date. The commissioner may establish rules for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the registry.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-130.
Continuing education for mortgage loan originators; rulemaking.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements referred to in W.S. 40-23-129(a)(ii), a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight (8) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations relating to mortgage origination;

Two (2) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of section (a) of this section, continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the registry. The review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

Except as provided in W.S. 40-23-129(b), shall only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken; and

Shall not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two (2) hours of credit for every one (1) hour taught.

An individual having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the registry in paragraphs (a)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of continuing education requirements in Wyoming.

An individual meeting the requirements of W.S. 40-23-129(a)(i) and (iii) may make up any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule of the commissioner.

An individual licensed under W.S.

40-23-124

after July 1, 2009 and who subsequently applies to be licensed again shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-131.
Mortgage call reports.

Each licensee shall submit to the registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain all information as required by the registry.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-23-132.
Report to the registry.

The commissioner shall regularly report violations of this act, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the registry subject to the provisions contained in W.S.

40-23-112

. The commissioner shall establish by rule a process where a mortgage loan originator may challenge information entered into the registry by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.